District of Columbia statutes.
2-301.01

Repealed

Purposes, rules of construction.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 101, 32 DCR 7396
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(a), 44 DCR 1423
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 119(a), 47 DCR 520
June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-122, § 2(a), 53 DCR 2834
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 106(a), 56 DCR 1117
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
1981 Ed., § 1-1181.1.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the District of Columbia Government Purchase Card Program Reporting Requirements Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-253, March 17, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4129).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of D.C. Law 16-86, see § 2 of the Contracting and Procurement Reform Task Force Membership Authorization and Qualifications Clarification Temporary Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-120, June 8, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 5358).
For temporary (225 day) additions, see § 2 to 8 of the Contracting and Procurement Reform Task Force Establishment Temporary Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-86, April 4, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 3345).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Advisory Neighborhood Commission Procurement Exclusion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-497, December 18, 2000, 48 DCR 78).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see §§ 2 to 8 of Contracting and Procurement Reform Task Force Establishment Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-245, December 22, 2005, 53 DCR 271).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of additions, see §§ 2 and 3 of Contracting and Procurement Reform Task Force Membership Authorization and Qualifications Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-299, February 27, 2006, 53 DCR 1879).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see §§ 2 to 8 of Contracting and Procurement Reform Task Force Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-331, March 23, 2006, 53 DCR 2591).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of D.C. Law 16-120, see § 2 of Contracting and Procurement Reform Task Force Membership Authorization and Qualifications Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-406, June 26, 2006, 2006, 53 DCR 5424).
For temporary (90 day) enactment, see §§ 2 to 6 of District of Columbia Contracting and Procurement Reform Task Force Establishment Extension Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-531, December 4, 2006, 53 DCR 9838).
Contracting authority for Year 2000 remediation contracts, see Mayor’s Order 99-54, March 5, 1999 ( 46 DCR 2831).

Limitation of contracting authority for D.C. government offices, departments and agencies: See Mayor’s Order 85-110, July 9, 1985.

Emergency procurement to provide temporary housing for homeless families in the District of Columbia: See Mayor’s Order 90-199, December 13, 1990.

Requirement That All Agencies Prepare an Annual Service Level Agreement (Acquisition Planning Document), see Mayor’s Order 2001-88, June 18, 2001 ( 48 DCR 5978).

Compliance with equal opportunity obligations in contracts: See Mayor’s Order 85-85, June 10, 1985.

Demolition and development of the Oyster School building: Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 12-174 authorized the Board of Education to enter into a Development Agreement with a Developer and any other agreement necessary to carry out the purposes of the act, notwithstanding the provisions of this section.